Florida, session 2026, HB1489.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
146
147 Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Healthy Florida
148 Act."
149 Section 2. Section 381.4011, Florida Statutes, is created
150 to read:
Page 6 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
151 381.4011 Financial assistance for patients of large health
152 care facilities.—
153 (1) SHORT TITLE.—This section may be cited as the "Medical
154 Debt Protection Act."
155 (2) PURPOSE.—The purpose of this section is to reduce
156 burdensome medical debt and to protect patients in their
157 dealings with medical creditors, medical debt buyers, and
158 medical debt collectors with respect to such debt. This section
159 shall be construed as a consumer protection statute and shall be
160 liberally and remedially construed to carry out its purposes.
161 (3) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
162 (a) "Consumer" means a natural person.
163 (b) "Consumer reporting agency" means a person or entity
164 that, for monetary fees or dues or on a cooperative nonprofit
165 basis, regularly engages in whole or in part in the practice of
166 assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other
167 information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing consumer
168 reports to third parties.
169 (c) "External review" means a review of an adverse benefit
170 determination, including, but not limited to, a final internal
171 adverse benefit determination, conducted pursuant to an
172 applicable state external review process, a federal external
173 review process as described in 42 U.S.C. s. 300gg-19, a review
174 pursuant to 29 U.S.C. s. 1133, a Medicare appeals process, a
175 Medicaid appeals process, or another applicable appeals process.
Page 7 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
176 (d) "Extraordinary collection action" means any of the
177 following:
178 1. Selling a consumer's debt to another party, except if,
179 before the sale, the medical creditor has entered into a legally
180 binding written agreement with the medical debt buyer of the
181 debt pursuant to which:
182 a. The medical debt buyer or medical debt collector is
183 prohibited from engaging in any prohibited collection actions
184 listed in subsection (8) to obtain payment for the care;
185 b. The medical debt buyer may not charge interest on the
186 debt in excess of that described in subsection (14);
187 c. The debt is returnable to or recallable by the medical
188 creditor upon a determination by the medical creditor or medical
189 debt buyer that the consumer is eligible for financial
190 assistance; and
191 d. If the consumer is determined to be eligible for
192 financial assistance and the debt is not returned to or recalled
193 by the medical creditor, the medical debt buyer is required to
194 adhere to the procedures specified in the agreement that ensures
195 that the consumer does not pay, and has no obligation to pay,
196 the medical debt buyer and the medical creditor together more
197 than the consumer is personally responsible for paying in
198 compliance with this section.
199 2. Filing a debt collection lawsuit.
200 3. Any prohibited collection action.
Page 8 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
201 (e) "Financial assistance policy" means a written
202 financial assistance policy that includes:
203 1. Eligibility criteria for financial assistance,
204 including when such assistance covers free or discounted care.
205 2. The basis for calculating amounts charged to patients.
206 3. The method for applying for financial assistance.
207 4. The billing and collections policy containing the
208 actions the covered health care provider may take in the event
209 of nonpayment, including collections action.
210 5. Measures to widely publicize the policy within the
211 community to be served by the covered health care provider.
212 (f) "Gross charges" means a covered health care provider's
213 full, established price for health care services that the
214 covered health care provider charges uninsured patients before
215 applying any contractual allowances, discounts, or deductions.
216 Such price may be referred to elsewhere as standard charges, as
217 provided in 42 U.S.C.A. s. 300gg-18, or chargemaster rates.
218 (g) "Health care services" means services for the
219 diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure, or relief of a physical,
220 dental, behavioral, substance use disorder, or mental health
221 condition, illness, injury, or disease. These services include,
222 but are not limited to, any procedures, products, devices, or
223 medications.
224 (h) "Household income" or "income" means income calculated
225 by using the methods used to calculate Medicaid eligibility, as
Page 9 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
226 set forth at 42 C.F.R. s. 435.603, or a comparable method
227 designated by the Department of Children and Families.
228 (i) "Internal review" or "internal appeal" means review by
229 a health insurance plan or other insurer of an adverse benefit
230 determination.
231 (j) "Large health care facility" means any the following
232 entities:
233 1. A hospital licensed under chapter 395, whether a
234 nonprofit entity subject to 26 U.S.C. s. 501(c)(3); a hospital
235 owned by a county, a municipality, or this state; or a for-
236 profit entity that provides health care services.
237 2. An outpatient clinic or facility affiliated with a
238 hospital, as described in subparagraph 1., or operating under
239 the license of a hospital, as described in subparagraph 1.
240 3. An ambulatory surgical center licensed under chapter
241 395.
242 4. A practice that provides outpatient medical,
243 behavioral, optical, radiology, laboratory, dental, or other
244 health care services with revenues of at least $20,000,000
245 annually, and that is licensed or permitted under chapter 395,
246 chapter 408, chapter 483, chapter 484, chapter 466, or any other
247 chapter that licenses or permits health care facilities.
248 5. A licensed health care professional who provides health
249 care services in one or more of the settings listed in
250 subparagraphs 1.-4., but bills patients independently.
Page 10 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
251 (k) "Medical creditor" means an entity that provides
252 health care services and to which the patient owes money for
253 health care services, or an entity that provided health care
254 services and to which the patient previously owed money if the
255 medical debt has been purchased by one or more debt buyers.
256 (l) "Medical debt" means an obligation or alleged
257 obligation of a patient to pay any amount related to the receipt
258 of health care services, products, or devices. The term does not
259 include debt charged to a credit card or other extension of
260 credit unless the credit card or extension of credit is offered
261 specifically for the payment of health care services, products,
262 or devices.
263 (m) "Medical debt buyer" means a person or entity that is
264 engaged in the business of purchasing medical debts for
265 collection purposes, whether the person or entity collects the
266 debt or hires a third party for collection or an attorney at law
267 for litigation in order to collect such debt.
268 (n) "Medical debt collector" means a person or entity that
269 regularly collects or attempts to collect, directly or
270 indirectly, medical debts originally owed or due or asserted to
271 be owed or due another. The term includes a medical debt buyer
272 for all purposes.
273 (o) "Patient" means the person who received health care
274 services. The term includes a parent if the patient is a minor,
275 or a legal guardian if the patient is an adult under
Page 11 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
276 guardianship.
277 (p) "Patient income" means the household income of the
278 patient's family.
279 (q) "Prohibited collection actions" means any of the
280 following activities when used by a medical creditor or medical
281 debt collector to collect debts owed for health care services:
282 1. Causing or threatening to cause a consumer's arrest.
283 2. Causing or threatening to cause a consumer to be
284 subject to a capias or similar warrant.
285 3. Obtaining or threatening to obtain a lien on a
286 consumer's real property.
287 4. Foreclosing or threatening to foreclose on a
288 consumer's real property.
289 5. Garnishing or threatening to garnish wages or state
290 income tax refunds.
291 6. Using state or federal tax offsets to seize tax refunds
292 or tax credits.
293 7. Attaching, seizing, or threatening to attach or seize a
294 consumer's bank account.
295 8. Furnishing or threatening to furnish information about
296 the medical debt to a consumer reporting agency.
297 (4) FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE POLICY FOR LARGE HEALTH CARE
298 FACILITIES.—
299 (a)1. A large health care facility must develop a written
300 financial assistance policy that complies with this section and
Page 12 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
301 any implementing regulations.
302 2. The requirement under subparagraph 1. applies whether
303 or not the large health care facility is required to develop a
304 financial assistance policy under 26 U.S.C. s. 501(r)-(4) and
305 implementing regulations.
306 (b) The financial assistance policy required under
307 subparagraph (a)1. must, at a minimum, contain the following:
308 1. A written explanation of the financial assistance that
309 is available for emergency and other medically necessary health
310 care services offered by a covered health care provider.
311 2. A summary, in plain language, of the financial
312 assistance policy which does not exceed two pages in length.
313 3. The eligibility criteria for financial assistance and a
314 summary of the type of assistance that is available as set forth
315 in this section.
316 4. The method and application process that patients are to
317 use to apply for financial assistance.
318 5. The information and documentation the large health care
319 facility may require patients to provide as part of the
320 application.
321 6. The reasonable steps that a health care provider will
322 take to determine whether a patient is eligible for financial
323 assistance.
324 7. The billing and collections policy, including the
325 actions that may be taken in the event of nonpayment, which must
Page 13 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
326 comply with all applicable provisions of this section and other
327 applicable municipal, county, state, or federal laws.
328 (c) The financial assistance policy must be approved by
329 the owners or governing body of a health care provider. The
330 financial assistance policy shall be reviewed and approved on an
331 annual basis by the owners or governing board.
332 (d) The financial assistance policy must apply to all
333 patients who are financially eligible based on income as
334 provided in subsection (5). Patients may not be denied financial
335 assistance on the basis of residency, health insurance coverage
336 status, citizenship or immigration status, or assets or
337 prospective assets.
338 (5) IMPLEMENTATION OF THE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE POLICY.—
339 (a) In addition to any other actions required by
340 applicable municipal, county, state, or federal law, a large
341 health care facility must screen all patients for eligibility
342 for financial assistance by taking all of the following steps
343 before seeking payment for any emergency or medically necessary
344 health care services:
345 1. Determine whether the patient has health insurance. If
346 the patient is uninsured, offer to screen the patient for public
347 or private insurance eligibility and offer assistance if the
348 patient chooses to apply for public or private insurance. A
349 patient's refusal to be screened is not grounds for denying
350 financial assistance.
Page 14 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
351 2. Offer to screen the patient for other public programs
352 that may assist with health care costs. However, a patient's
353 refusal to be screened is not grounds for denying financial
354 assistance.
355 3. If the patient submits an application for financial
356 assistance, determine the patient's eligibility for the
357 financial assistance plan within 14 days after the patient
358 applies for financial assistance, suspending any billing or
359 collections actions while eligibility is being determined.
360 (b) The following patients qualify for financial
361 assistance under the financial assistance plan, which applies to
362 any charges for health care services that are not covered by
363 insurance and would otherwise be billed to the patient:
364 1. Patients with household incomes at or below 300 percent
365 of the federal poverty level shall receive free care.
366 2. Patients with household incomes above 300 percent, up
367 to and including 400 percent, of the federal poverty level shall
368 be charged no more than the amount calculated in the following
369 manner:
370 a. The patient's bill shall be recalculated using the
371 Medicare reimbursement rate applicable on the date of service;
372 and
373 b. The patient shall be charged no more than 25 percent of
374 the recalculated bill under sub-subparagraph a.
375 3. Patients with household incomes above 400 percent, up
Page 15 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
376 to and including 600 percent, of the federal poverty level shall
377 receive the same discounts as patients with household incomes
378 above 300 percent, up to and including 400 percent, of the
379 federal poverty level if the patient and the patient's household
380 have incurred medical expenses from the current large health
381 care facility's bill and all other medical bills for medically
382 necessary health care services received during the previous 12
383 months which, in total, exceed 5 percent of the household's
384 annual gross income.
385 4. In addition to other financial assistance provided
386 under this section, patients with household incomes at or below
387 400 percent of the federal poverty level may not be required to
388 pay more than $2,300 per year in cumulative medical bills to
389 large health care facilities. Upon patient request and
390 documentation, any health care services that have been delivered
391 by one or more large health care facilities after the $2,300
392 limit has been met must be provided as free care.
393 (c)1. Household income shall be established by the most
394 recent tax return, unless the patient chooses to submit pay
395 stubs, documentation of public assistance, or documentation of
396 household income that the Department of Children and Families
397 has identified as a valid form of documentation for the purposes
398 of this section. Additional documentation other than proof of
399 income may not be required.
400 2. If a large health care facility uses a consumer report,
Page 16 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
401 as defined in s. 603(d) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15
402 U.S.C. s. 1681a(d), or any score or rating based on consumer
403 report information, the facility must obtain the consumer's
404 consent for such use and must comply with all applicable
405 provisions of this section.
406 3. A large health care facility may grant financial
407 assistance notwithstanding a patient's failure to provide one of
408 the required forms of documentation described in the financial
409 assistance policy or application form and may rely on, but not
410 require, other evidence of eligibility. Proof that the patient
411 receives a means-tested benefit from the federal, state, or
412 local government is sufficient to establish eligibility for
413 financial assistance without additional documentation of income.
414 4. A large health care facility must screen, under
415 paragraph (a), a patient for presumptive eligibility for
416 financial assistance as set forth in paragraph (b). The rules
417 and process for screening a patient for presumptive eligibility
418 for financial assistance must require a large health care
419 facility to inform any patient who is deemed presumptively
420 eligible for financial assistance that the large health care
421 facility has reduced or eliminated the patient's medical bill,
422 specify if any amount is currently outstanding, and explain how
423 to apply for additional financial assistance for any remaining
424 balance.
425 5. If a large health care provider chooses to use credit
Page 17 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
426 reports or scores or similar screening tools when determining
427 eligibility for financial assistance, the large health care
428 provider may:
429 a. Use such tools only to make a positive eligibility
430 determination, and not to deny financial assistance to any
431 patient; and
432 b. Obtain credit reports or scores and use the reports or
433 scores only for screening if the patient consents by signing a
434 stand-alone document granting permission for the credit check,
435 which shall be effective for no more than 30 days.
436 (d) If a large health care facility receives an
437 application for financial assistance from a patient, the
438 facility shall notify the patient in writing within 14 days as
439 to whether the facility has approved or denied the application.
440 The large health care facility shall provide a copy of any
441 recalculated bill and calculation of financial assistance
442 provided to the patient.
443 (e) A large health care facility shall accept and consider
444 a patient's application for financial assistance when the
445 application is submitted within 1 year after the date of the
446 first bill for the provision of the health care services.
447 However, if the patient is the subject of collection activity by
448 the facility or a medical debt collector, including a lawsuit to
449 collect a medical debt, and submits an application for financial
450 assistance, the large health care facility shall accept and
Page 18 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
451 process the application at any time. If the patient submits a
452 financial assistance application to a medical debt collector,
453 the medical debt collector shall forward the application to the
454 large health care facility within 2 business days, and shall
455 cease collection activity until notified by the large health
456 care facility of the outcome of the application and any debt
457 forgiven or new repayment terms.
458 (f) A large health care facility and medical debt
459 collector may not charge any interest or late fees to patients
460 who qualify for financial assistance.
461 (g) A large health care facility and medical debt
462 collector shall offer to any patient who qualifies for financial
463 assistance a payment plan of not less than 24 months, and may
464 not require the patient to make monthly payments that exceed 5
465 percent of the household's gross monthly income. Prepayment
466 penalties, early payment penalties, or fees are prohibited.
467 (h) For a patient who has been found to be eligible for
468 financial assistance, the initial payment on a monthly payment
469 plan may not be due within the first 90 days after the health
470 care services are provided.
471 (6) FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE POLICY; PUBLIC EDUCATION AND
472 INFORMATION.—
473 (a) A large health care facility must do all of the
474 following to publicize its financial assistance policy:
475 1. Make the financial assistance policy and the financial
Page 19 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
476 assistance application form easily accessible online, through
477 the large health care facility's website and through any patient
478 portal or other online communication portal used by patients of
479 the health care provider.
480 2. In addition to any other requirements in this section,
481 make paper copies of the financial assistance policy and the
482 application form available upon request and without charge, both
483 by mail and in the large health care facility's office. For
484 hospitals, copies should be available, at a minimum, in the
485 emergency room, if there is an emergency room, and admissions
486 areas.
487 3. Notify and inform members of the community served by
488 the large health care facility about the financial assistance
489 policy in a manner reasonably calculated to reach those members
490 who are most likely to require financial assistance with such
491 efforts commensurate to the size and income of the facility.
492 4. Notify and inform patients who receive care from the
493 large health care facility about the financial assistance policy
494 by doing all of the following:
495 a. Offer a paper copy of the financial assistance policy
496 to a patient as part of the patient's first visit or, in the
497 case of a hospital facility, during the intake and discharge
498 process.
499 b. Include a conspicuous written notice on all billing
500 statements, whether sent by the large health care facility or a
Page 20 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
501 medical debt collector, which notifies and informs patients
502 about the availability of financial assistance and includes the
503 telephone number of the large health care facility's office or
504 department that can provide information about the financial
505 assistance policy and application process and the direct website
506 address where copies of the financial assistance policy and
507 application form may be obtained.
508 c. Place conspicuous public displays, or other measures
509 reasonably calculated to attract patients' attention, which
510 notify and inform patients about the financial assistance policy
511 in public locations in the large health care facility's office.
512 For hospitals, displays should be posted in the emergency room,
513 if there is an emergency room and admissions areas, at a
514 minimum.
515 (b) In all attempts, whether written or oral, by a medical
516 creditor or medical debt collector to collect a medical debt for
517 health care services provided by a large health care facility,
518 the medical creditor or medical debt collector must inform the
519 patient of any financial assistance policy available through the
520 large health care facility.
521 (7) FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE POLICIES; LANGUAGE ACCESS.—
522 (a) A financial assistance policy must include a notice
523 that states the following or substantially similar language:
524 "This document contains important information about financial
525 assistance for your bill. Contact [insert name and telephone
Page 21 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
526 number of large health care facility] for translation
527 assistance." The statement must be translated in the 10
528 languages most frequently spoken by limited English proficient
529 households in the large health care facility's service area, as
530 determined by the United States Census Bureau data.
531 (b) A large health care facility must accommodate all
532 significant populations that have limited English proficiency by
533 translating the financial assistance policy and application form
534 into the primary languages spoken by such populations. A large
535 health care facility satisfies this translation requirement if
536 it makes available translations of its financial assistance
537 policy and application form in the language spoken by each
538 limited English proficiency language group that constitutes the
539 lesser of 1,000 individuals or 5 percent of the community served
540 by the large health care facility or the population likely to be
541 affected or encountered by the large health care facility. A
542 large health care facility may determine the percentage or
543 number of limited English proficiency individuals in the large
544 health care facility's community or likely to be affected or
545 encountered by the large health care facility using any
546 reasonable method.
547 (c) A large health care facility must accommodate any
548 patient with limited English proficiency who is part of a
549 population that falls below the numerical thresholds established
550 in paragraph (b) by providing oral interpretation services to
Page 22 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
551 the patient upon request and at no cost to the patient to
552 explain the financial assistance policy and the application
553 form.
554 (d) A large health care facility must accommodate any
555 patient with limited English proficiency in answering questions
556 from the patient regarding the financial assistance policy, the
557 application form, any written determination of eligibility, and
558 any other communication regarding financial assistance from the
559 large health care facility. A large health care facility may
560 accommodate these patients by providing oral interpretation
561 services to the patient upon request and at no cost to the
562 patient.
563 (8) BILLING AND COLLECTIONS RULES, LIMITS ON CREDITORS.—
564 (a) A medical creditor or medical debt collector may not
565 engage in prohibited collection actions to collect medical debts
566 owed for health care services.
567 (b) A medical creditor or medical debt collector may not
568 engage in any extraordinary collection actions until 180 days
569 after the first bill for a medical debt has been sent.
570 (c) At least 30 days before taking any permissible
571 extraordinary collection actions, a medical creditor or medical
572 debt collector must provide to the patient a notice that:
573 1. In the case of large health care facilities and medical
574 debt collectors collecting debt for health care services
575 provided by such facilities, states that financial assistance is
Page 23 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
576 available for eligible patients and providing a summary, in
577 plain language, of the financial assistance policy.
578 2. Identifies the extraordinary collection actions that
579 will be initiated in order to obtain payment.
580 3. Provides a deadline after which such extraordinary
581 collection actions will be initiated, which date is no earlier
582 than 30 days after the date of the notice.
583 (d) A medical debt collector collecting debt for health
584 care services provided by such a large health care facility may
585 not engage in extraordinary collection actions during a declared
586 state or federal emergency or a public health emergency.
587 (e) A large health care facility or a medical debt
588 collector collecting debt for health care services provided by
589 such a facility may not use any extraordinary collection actions
590 unless these actions are described in the large health care
591 facility's billing and collections policy.
592 (f) If a large health care facility or a medical debt
593 collector collecting debt for health care services provided by
594 such a facility bills or initiates collection activities and the
595 patient is later found eligible for financial assistance, the
596 large health care facility or medical debt collector shall
597 reverse any permissible extraordinary collection actions or any
598 collection activity that were previously permissible and have
599 since become prohibited, including, but not limited to:
600 1. Deleting any negative reports to consumer reporting
Page 24 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
601 agencies.
602 2. Dismissing or vacating any collection lawsuits over the
603 medical debt.
604 3. Removing any wage garnishment orders or state tax
605 refund interception requests.
606 (g) If the patient has paid any part of the medical debt
607 or any of the patient's funds has been seized or levied in
608 excess of the amount that the patient owes after application of
609 financial assistance, the large health care facility or medical
610 debt collector shall refund any excess amount to the patient.
611 (9) PRICE INFORMATION.—A large health care facility must
612 post price information on its website. The price information
613 must be accessible through a link from the website's homepage
614 and, at a minimum, must include the following:
615 (a) A list of gross charges for all health care services.
616 (b) A list of the amount that Medicare would reimburse for
617 the health care service, next to the relevant gross charge.
618 (c) The titles or descriptions of health care services, in
619 plain language that can be understood by an average person.
620 (10) LIABILITY FOR MEDICAL DEBT.—
621 (a) Parents and legal guardians are jointly liable for any
622 medical debt incurred by children under the age of 18.
623 (b) A spouse or person may not be held personally liable
624 for the medical debt or nursing home debt of any other person
625 age 18 or older, or other damages related to the collection of
Page 25 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
626 the patient's bill.
627 (c) Any admission agreement must comply with applicable
628 federal and state laws, including the Nursing Home Reform Law,
629 42 U.S.C. s. 1395i-3.
630 (11) VERIFICATION UPON WRITTEN OR ORAL REQUEST.—A medical
631 creditor or medical debt collector shall provide an itemized
632 bill to the patient within 60 days after a request. The itemized
633 bill must state:
634 (a) The name and address of the medical creditor.
635 (b) The date of service.
636 (c) The date the medical debt was incurred, if different
637 from the date of service.
638 (d) A detailed list of the specific health care services
639 provided to the patient.
640 (e) A list of all health care professionals who treated
641 the patient.
642 (f) The amount of principal for any medical debt incurred.
643 (g) Any adjustment to the bill, such as negotiated
644 insurance rates or other discounts.
645 (h) The amount of any payments received, whether from the
646 patient or any other party.
647 (i) Any interest or fees.
648 (j) Whether the patient was screened for financial
649 assistance.
650 (k) Whether the patient was found eligible for financial
Page 26 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
651 assistance and, if so, the amount due after all financial
652 assistance has been applied to the itemized bill.
653 (12) MEDICAL DEBT AND CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCIES.—
654 (a) A consumer reporting agency may not make a consumer
655 report containing an item of information that the consumer
656 reporting agency knows or should know concerns medical debt.
657 (b) A person may not communicate with or report any
658 information to any consumer reporting agency regarding a medical
659 debt.
660 (c) A person who uses a consumer report may not use a
661 medical debt listed on the report as a negative factor when
662 making a credit, employment, or housing decision.
663 (d) A medical creditor shall include a provision in any
664 contract entered into with a medical debt collect or for the
665 purchase or collection of medical debt which prohibits the
666 reporting of any portion of such medical debt to a consumer
667 reporting agency.
668 (13) PROHIBITION AGAINST COLLECTION OF MEDICAL DEBT DURING
669 HEALTH INSURANCE APPEALS.—
670 (a) A medical creditor or medical debt collector that
671 knows or should have known about an internal review, external
672 review, or other internal appeal of a health insurance decision
673 that is pending or was pending within the previous 180 days may
674 not:
675 1. Communicate with the patient regarding the unpaid
Page 27 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
676 charges for health care services for the purpose of seeking to
677 collect the charges; or
678 2. Initiate a lawsuit or arbitration proceeding against
679 the patient relating to unpaid charges for health care services.
680 (b) A medical creditor that knows or should have known
681 about an internal review, external review, or other internal
682 appeal of a health insurance decision that is pending or was
683 pending within the previous 180 days may not refer, place, or
684 send the unpaid charges for health care services to a medical
685 debt collector, including by selling the debt to a medical debt
686 buyer.
687 (14) INTEREST ON MEDICAL DEBT.—
688 (a) Unless a patient is eligible for financial assistance
689 under paragraph (5)(b), and notwithstanding any agreement to the
690 contrary, interest on medical debt may not exceed 2 percent per
691 annum. Patients eligible for financial assistance may not be
692 charged any interest or late fees.
693 (b) The rate of interest provided in paragraph (a) also
694 applies to any judgments on medical debt, notwithstanding any
695 agreement to the contrary.
696 (15) MEDICAL DEBT PAYMENT PLANS.—
697 (a) A medical creditor or medical debt collector that
698 agrees to a payment plan for a medical debt shall provide a
699 written copy of the payment plan to the patient within 5
700 business days after entering into the payment plan. This plan
Page 28 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
701 must prominently disclose the rate of any interest being applied
702 to the debt in compliance with subsection (14), and the date by
703 which the account will be paid off in full, assuming the
704 payments set by the schedule are made without interruption.
705 (b) A consumer need not make a payment on the payment plan
706 until the written copy has been provided.
707 (c)1. A medical debt payment plan may be accelerated or
708 declared in default or terminated due to nonpayment only after
709 the patient fails to make scheduled payments on the payment plan
710 for at least 3 consecutive months.
711 2. Before declaring the payment plan terminated, the
712 medical creditor or medical debt collector must do all of the
713 following:
714 a. Make at least three reasonable attempts to contact the
715 patient by telephone or by other method preferred by the
716 patient.
717 b. Provide a written notice informing the patient that the
718 payment plan may be terminated and that the patient has the
719 opportunity to renegotiate the payment plan.
720 c. Attempt to renegotiate the terms of the defaulted
721 payment plan, if requested by the patient.
722 3. The medical creditor or medical debt collector may not
723 commence a civil action against the patient or responsible party
724 for nonpayment until at least 90 days after the payment plan is
725 declared to be terminated. For purposes of this section, the
Page 29 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
726 notice and telephone call to the patient may be made to the last
727 known telephone number and address of the patient.
728 (16) RECEIPTS FOR PAYMENTS.—Within 10 business days after
729 receipt of a payment on a medical debt, a medical creditor or
730 medical debt collector, or any agents thereof, receiving the
731 payment shall furnish a receipt to the person that made the
732 payment. The receipt must show all of the following:
733 (a) The date of the provision of the health care service.
734 (b) The amount paid.
735 (c) The date payment was received.
736 (d) The account's balance before the most recent payment.
737 (e) The new balance after application of the payment.
738 (f) The interest rate and interest accrued since the
739 patient's last payment.
740 (g) The patient's account number.
741 (h) The name of the current owner of the debt and, if
742 different, the name of the medical creditor.
743 (i) Whether the payment is accepted as payment in full of
744 the debt.
745 (17) DEBT FORGIVEN BY MEDICAL CREDITOR.—Forgiveness of any
746 part of an insured patient's copayment, coinsurance, deductible,
747 facility fees, out-of-network charges, or other cost sharing is
748 not a breach of contract or other violation of an agreement
749 between the medical creditor and the insurer or payor.
750 (18) PRIVATE REMEDY.—
Page 30 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
751 (a) Collection activity against a patient who the large
752 health care facility, medical creditor, or medical debt
753 collector knew or should have known was, or should have been,
754 eligible for financial assistance is an unfair or deceptive
755 trade practice in violation of part II of chapter 501. Any other
756 violation of this section by a medical creditor or medical debt
757 collector is also an unfair or deceptive trade practice in
758 violation of part II of chapter 501.
759 (b) A patient may sue for injunctive or other appropriate
760 equitable relief to enforce this section.
761 (c) The remedies provided in this section are not intended
762 to be the exclusive remedies available to a patient, and the
763 patient is not required to exhaust any administrative remedies
764 provided under this section or any other applicable law.
765 (d) A financial assistance policy or agreement between a
766 patient and a large health care provider or medical debt
767 collector may not contain a provision that, before a dispute
768 arises, waives or has the practical effect of waiving the rights
769 of the patient to resolve that dispute by obtaining:
770 1. Injunctive, declaratory, or other equitable relief;
771 2. Multiple or minimum damages as specified by law;
772 3. Attorney fees and costs as specified by law; or
773 4. A hearing at which a party can present evidence in
774 person.
775 (e) Any provision in a financial assistance policy or
Page 31 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
776 other written agreement violating paragraph (d) is void and
777 unenforceable. A court may refuse to enforce other provisions of
778 the financial assistance policy or other written agreement as
779 equity may require.
780 (19) PROHIBITION OF WAIVER OF RIGHTS.—Any waiver by a
781 patient of any protection provided by or any right of the
782 patient or other person under this section is void and may not
783 be enforced by any court or any other person. A large health
784 care facility may not circumvent the responsibilities and
785 protections of this section by requiring prepayment for medical
786 care.
787 (20) ENFORCEMENT.—
788 (a) The Office of the Attorney General may enforce this
789 section and may adopt any regulation or rules necessary or
790 appropriate to carry out the purpose of this section, to provide
791 for the protection of patients, and to assist market
792 participants in interpreting this section.
793 (b) The Office of the Attorney General shall establish a
794 complaint process whereby an aggrieved consumer or any member of
795 the public may file a complaint against a medical creditor or
796 medical debt collector who violates any provision of this
797 section. All complaints shall be considered public records.
798 (21) ANNUAL REPORTS AND DATABASE.—
799 (a) On or before July 1 of each year, beginning July 1,
800 2028, each large health care provider shall file its financial
Page 32 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
801 assistance policy and an annual report with the Legislature and
802 the Office of the Attorney General pursuant to procedures that
803 the Office of the Attorney General shall establish.
804 (b) The Office of the Attorney General shall post each
805 report and financial assistance policy in a searchable database
806 accessible on the Internet.
807 (c) The Office of the Attorney General shall prepare an
808 annual consolidated report and shall make it available to the
809 public. The report must include the following information for
810 the time period of July 1 of the prior year to July of that
811 year:
812 1. The total number of patients who applied for financial
813 assistance.
814 2. The total number of patients who received financial
815 assistance.
816 3. The total number of patients who were denied financial
817 assistance.
818 4. Deidentified demographic information for patients who
819 received financial assistance, including zip code, race,
820 language, gender, and disability status, to the extent that such
821 data is available from the large health care facility.
822 5. The total amount of financial assistance provided to
823 patients.
824 6. The types of collection practices used.
825 7. The amounts of money collected with each of these
Page 33 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
826 collection practices, in dollars and by percentage of the large
827 health care facility's annual revenue.
828 (22) SEVERABILITY.—If any provision of this section or its
829 application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, that
830 provision or its application is severable and does not affect
831 the validity of the other provisions or applications of this
832 section.
833 Section 3. Part IV of chapter 641, Florida Statutes,
834 consisting of ss. 641.71-641.799, Florida Statutes, is created
835 and entitled the "Florida Health Plan."
836 Section 4. Section 641.71, Florida Statutes, is created to
837 read:
838 641.71 Short title.—This part may be cited as the "Florida
839 Health Plan."
840 Section 5. Section 641.72, Florida Statutes, is created to
841 read:
842 641.72 Purpose.—There is created the Florida Health Plan.
843 The purpose of the Florida Health Plan is to keep residents of
844 this state healthy and to provide the best quality of health
845 care by:
846 (1) Ensuring that all residents of this state, regardless
847 of immigration status, are covered.
848 (2) Covering all necessary care, including dental; vision;
849 hearing; mental health; reproductive care, including abortion
850 services and prenatal and postpartum care; gender-affirming
Page 34 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
851 health care, including medication and treatment; substance use
852 disorder treatment; prescription drugs; durable medical
853 equipment and supplies; and long-term care and home care,
854 including long-term services and supports in home and community-
855 based settings.
856 (3) Allowing patients to choose their health care
857 providers.
858 (4) Reducing costs by negotiating fair prices and cutting
859 administrative bureaucracy, through measures such as a global
860 budget approach to institutional providers, and not by
861 restricting or denying care.
862 (5) Being affordable to all patients through financing
863 based on a patient's ability to pay and the elimination of
864 premiums, copayments, deductibles, and out-of-pocket expenses at
865 the point of service.
866 (6) Focusing on preventive care and early intervention to
867 improve health.
868 (7) Ensuring that there are enough health care providers
869 to guarantee timely access to care.
870 (8) Continuing this state's leadership in medical
871 education, research, and technology.
872 (9) Providing adequate and timely payments to health care
873 providers.
874 (10) Using a simple funding and payment system.
875 (11) Providing a just transition for a displaced workforce
Page 35 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
876 affected by changes.
877 Section 6. Section 641.73, Florida Statutes, is created to
878 read:
879 641.73 Definitions.—As used in this part, the term:
880 (1) "Board" means the Florida Health Board established in
881 s. 641.793.
882 (2) "Institutional provider" means an inpatient hospital,
883 nursing facility, rehabilitation facility, or any other health
884 care facility that provides overnight care.
885 (3) "Medically necessary" means comprehensive services or
886 supplies needed to promote health and to prevent, diagnose, or
887 treat a particular patient's medical condition. The
888 comprehensive services and supplies must meet accepted standards
889 of medical practice within a health care provider's professional
890 peer group.
891 (4) "Noninstitutional provider" means an individual
892 provider, group practice, clinic, outpatient surgical center,
893 imaging center, or any other health care facility that does not
894 provide overnight care.
895 (5) "Plan" means the Florida Health Plan created in s.
896 641.72.
897 (6) "Resident of this state" means an individual who has
898 had a principal place of domicile in this state for more than 6
899 consecutive months, who has registered to vote in this state,
900 who has made a statement of domicile pursuant to s. 222.17, or
Page 36 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
901 who has filed for homestead tax exemption on property in this
902 state.
903 Section 7. Section 641.74, Florida Statutes, is created to
904 read:
905 641.74 Eligibility for and enrollment in the Florida
906 Health Plan.—
907 (1) ELIGIBILITY.—
908 (a) All residents of this state, regardless of immigration
909 status, are eligible for the Florida Health Plan.
910 (b) Coverage for emergency care for a resident of this
911 state which is obtained out of state must be at prevailing local
912 rates where the care is provided. Coverage for nonemergency care
913 obtained out of state must be according to rates and conditions
914 established by the Florida Health Board. The board may require
915 that a resident of this state be transported back to this state
916 when prolonged treatment of an emergency condition is necessary
917 and when that transport will not adversely affect the patient's
918 care or condition.
919 (c) A nonresident visiting this state shall be billed by
920 the board for all services received under the plan. The board
921 may enter into intergovernmental arrangements or contracts with
922 other states and foreign countries to provide reciprocal
923 coverage for temporary visitors.
924 (d) The board shall extend eligibility to nonresidents
925 employed in this state under a premium schedule set by the
Page 37 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
926 board.
927 (e) For a business outside of this state which employs
928 residents of this state, the board shall apply for a federal
929 waiver to collect the employer contribution mandated by federal
930 law.
931 (f) A retiree who is covered under the plan and who elects
932 to reside outside of this state is eligible for benefits under
933 the terms and conditions of the retiree's employer-employee
934 contract.
935 (g) The board may establish financial arrangements with
936 other states and foreign countries in order to facilitate
937 meeting the terms of the contracts described in paragraph (f).
938 Payments for care provided by non-Florida health care providers
939 to retirees who are covered under the plan shall be reimbursed
940 at rates established by the board. Health care providers who
941 accept any payment from the plan for a covered service may not
942 bill the patient for the covered service.
943 (h)1. A person is presumed eligible for coverage under the
944 plan, and a health care provider shall provide health care
945 services as if the person is eligible for coverage under the
946 plan, if the person:
947 a. Is a minor;
948 b. Arrives at a health care facility unconscious,
949 comatose, or otherwise unable to document eligibility or to act
950 on the person's own behalf because of the person's physical or
Page 38 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
951 mental condition; or
952 c. Is involuntarily committed to an acute psychiatric
953 facility or to a hospital with psychiatric beds which provides
954 for involuntary commitment.
955 2. All health care facilities subject to state and federal
956 provisions governing emergency medical treatment must comply
957 with subparagraph 1.
958 (2) ENROLLMENT.—The board shall establish a procedure to
959 enroll residents of this state and provide each with
960 identification that may be used by health care providers to
961 confirm eligibility for services. The application for enrollment
962 may not be more than two pages.
963 Section 8. Section 641.755, Florida Statutes, is created
964 to read:
965 641.755 Benefits.—
966 (1) A person covered under the Florida Health Plan may
967 choose to receive services from any qualified, licensed health
968 care provider that participates in the plan.
969 (2) Except for the exclusions provided in subsection (4),
970 covered health care benefits under the plan include all
971 prescribed medically necessary care, which includes:
972 (a) Inpatient and outpatient health care facility
973 services.
974 (b) Inpatient and outpatient licensed health care provider
975 services.
Page 39 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
976 (c) Diagnostic imaging, laboratory services, and other
977 diagnostic and evaluative services.
978 (d) Durable medical equipment, appliances, and assistive
979 technology, including, but not limited to, prescribed
980 prosthetics, eye care, and hearing aids and their repair,
981 technical support, and customization required for individual
982 use.
983 (e) Inpatient and outpatient rehabilitative care.
984 (f) Emergency care services.
985 (g) Necessary transportation for health care services:
986 1. As covered under Medicaid or Medicare; or
987 2. For persons with disabilities, older persons with
988 functional limitations, and low-income persons.
989 (h) Child and adult immunizations and preventive care.
990 (i) Health and wellness education for chronic or
991 preventative care as provided by licensed health care providers.
992 (j) Reproductive health care, including abortion services,
993 contraceptives, and prenatal and postpartum care.
994 (k) Childbirth and maternity care, including doula
995 services and care in freestanding childbirth centers.
996 (l) Gender-affirming health care, including medication and
997 treatment.
998 (m) Holistic licensed health care services such as
999 chiropractic, acupressure, acupuncture, massage, and nutritional
1000 services.
Page 40 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1001 (n) Mental health services, including substance use
1002 disorder treatment, services in substance use disorder treatment
1003 facilities, and mental health care provided by licensed or
1004 certified mental health providers such as licensed
1005 psychologists, licensed mental health counselors, licensed
1006 professional counselors, licensed clinical social workers,
1007 certified master social workers, rehabilitation support service
1008 providers, and any providers that the board deems eligible.
1009 (o) Dental care, including diagnostics and restoration and
1010 durable equipment such as braces and mouthguards.
1011 (p) Vision care.
1012 (q) Hearing care.
1013 (r) Prescription drugs.
1014 (s) Podiatric care.
1015 (t) Therapies that are shown by the National Institutes of
1016 Health National Center for Complementary and Integrative Health
1017 to be safe and effective.
1018 (u) Blood and blood products.
1019 (v) Dialysis.
1020 (w) Licensed qualified adult day care.
1021 (x) Rehabilitative and habilitative services.
1022 (y) Ancillary health care or social services previously
1023 covered by this state's qualified public health programs.
1024 (z) Case management and care coordination.
1025 (aa) Language interpretation and translation for health
Page 41 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1026 care services, including sign language and Braille or other
1027 services needed for persons with communication barriers.
1028 (bb) Services provided by qualified community health
1029 workers.
1030 (cc) Health care and long-term supportive services,
1031 including in a home or community-based setting, assisted living
1032 facility, and nursing home, with home health care providers,
1033 home health aides, and palliative and hospice care.
1034 (dd) Any item or service described in this subsection which
1035 is furnished using telehealth, to the extent practicable.
1036 (3) The Florida Health Board may expand health care
1037 benefits beyond the minimum benefits described in subsection (2)
1038 if the expansion meets the intent of this part and when there
1039 are sufficient funds to cover the expansion.
1040 (4) The following health care services are excluded from
1041 coverage by the plan:
1042 (a) Treatments and procedures primarily for cosmetic
1043 purposes, unless required to correct a congenital defect or to
1044 restore or correct a part of the body that has been altered as a
1045 result of an injury, a disease, or a surgery or unless
1046 determined to be medically necessary by a qualified, licensed
1047 health care provider in the plan.
1048 (b) Services of a health care provider or facility that is
1049 not licensed, certified, or accredited by this state. The
1050 licensure, certification, or accreditation requirements do not
Page 42 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1051 apply to health care providers or facilities that provide
1052 services to residents of this state who require medical
1053 attention while traveling out of state.
1054 (5)(a) All plan enrollees must have a primary care
1055 provider and must have access to care coordination.
1056 (b) A plan enrollee does not need a referral to see a
1057 health care specialist.
1058 (c) The board may establish a computerized registry to
1059 assist enrollees in identifying appropriate providers, and the
1060 plan may assist an enrollee with choosing a primary care
1061 provider if the enrollee so chooses.
1062 (6) The plan may not impose a deductible, copayment,
1063 coinsurance, or any other cost-sharing requirement on an
1064 enrollee with respect to a covered benefit.
1065 Section 9. Section 641.77, Florida Statutes, is created to
1066 read:
1067 641.77 Federal preemption.—
1068 (1) The Florida Health Board shall secure a repeal or a
1069 waiver of any provision of federal law that preempts any
1070 provision of this part. The Department of Health and the Agency
1071 for Health Care Administration shall provide all necessary
1072 assistance to the board to secure any repeal or waiver.
1073 (2)(a) The board shall, under the state innovation waivers
1074 under s. 1332 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable
1075 Care Act, Pub. L. No. 111-148, as amended, request to repeal or
Page 43 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1076 waive any of the following provisions to the extent necessary to
1077 implement this part:
1078 1. Title 42 of the United States Code, ss. 18021-18024.
1079 2. Title 42 of the United States Code, ss. 18031-18033.
1080 3. Title 42 of the United States Code, s. 18071.
1081 4. Section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
1082 amended.
1083 (b) If a repeal or a waiver of a federal law or regulation
1084 cannot be secured, the board shall adopt rules, or seek
1085 conforming state legislation, consistent with federal law, in an
1086 effort to best fulfill the purposes of this part.
1087 (c) The Florida Health Plan's responsibility for providing
1088 health care is secondary to existing federal programs for health
1089 care services to the extent that funding for these programs is
1090 not transferred or that the transfer is delayed beyond the date
1091 on which initial benefits are provided under the plan.
1092 Section 10. Section 641.78, Florida Statutes, is created
1093 to read:
1094 641.78 Subrogation.—
1095 (1)(a) As used in this section, the term "collateral
1096 source" includes:
1097 1. A health insurance policy, health maintenance contract,
1098 continuing care contract, and prepaid health clinic contract,
1099 and the medical components of motor vehicle insurance,
1100 homeowner's insurance, and other forms of insurance.
Page 44 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1101 2. The medical components of worker's compensation.
1102 3. A pension plan and retiree health care benefits.
1103 4. An employer plan.
1104 5. An employee benefit contract.
1105 6. A government benefit program.
1106 7. A judgment for damages for personal injury.
1107 8. The state of last domicile for individuals moving to
1108 Florida for medical care who have extraordinary medical needs.
1109 9. Any third party who is or may be liable to an
1110 individual for health care services or costs.
1111 (b) The term does not include:
1112 1. A contract or plan that is subject to federal
1113 preemption.
1114 2. Any governmental unit, agency, or service to the extent
1115 that subrogation is prohibited by law.
1116 (2) When other payers for health care have been
1117 terminated, the plan shall collect health care costs from a
1118 collateral source if health care services provided to a patient
1119 are, or may be, covered services under the collateral source
1120 available to the patient, or if the patient has a right of
1121 action for compensation permitted under law.
1122 (3) The board shall negotiate waivers, seek federal
1123 legislation, or make other arrangements to incorporate
1124 collateral sources into the plan.
1125 (4) If a person who receives health care services under
Page 45 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1126 the plan is entitled to coverage, reimbursement, indemnity, or
1127 other compensation from a collateral source, the person must
1128 notify the health care provider and provide information
1129 identifying the collateral source, the nature and extent of
1130 coverage or entitlement, and other relevant information. The
1131 health care provider shall forward this information to the
1132 board. The person entitled to coverage, reimbursement,
1133 indemnity, or other compensation from a collateral source must
1134 provide additional information as requested by the board.
1135 (a) The plan shall seek reimbursement from the collateral
1136 source for services provided to the person and may take
1137 appropriate action, including legal proceedings, to recover the
1138 reimbursement. Upon demand, the collateral source shall pay the
1139 sum that it would have paid or spent on behalf of the person for
1140 the health care services provided by the plan.
1141 (b) In addition to any other right to recovery provided in
1142 this section, the board has the same right to recover the
1143 reasonable value of health care benefits from the collateral
1144 source.
1145 (c) If the collateral source is exempt from subrogation or
1146 the obligation to reimburse the plan, the board may require that
1147 the person who is entitled to health care services from the
1148 collateral source first seek those services from the collateral
1149 source before seeking the services from the plan.
1150 (5) To the extent permitted by federal law, the board has
Page 46 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1151 the same right of subrogation over contractual retiree health
1152 care benefits provided by employers as other contracts allowing
1153 the plan to recover the cost of health care services provided to
1154 a person covered by the retiree health care benefits, unless
1155 arrangements are made to transfer the revenues of the health
1156 care benefits directly to the plan.
1157 (6) A collateral source is not excluded from the
1158 obligations imposed by this section by virtue of a contract or
1159 relationship with a governmental unit, agency, or service.
1160 Section 11. Section 641.791, Florida Statutes, is created
1161 to read:
1162 641.791 Defaults, underpayments, and late payments.—
1163 (1) Defaults, underpayments, or late payments of any
1164 premium or other obligation imposed by this part shall result in
1165 the remedies and penalties provided by law, except as provided
1166 in this part.
1167 (2) Eligibility for health care benefits may not be
1168 impaired by any default, underpayment, or late payment of any
1169 premium or other obligation imposed by this part.
1170 Section 12. Section 641.792, Florida Statutes, is created
1171 to read:
1172 641.792 Provider payments.—
1173 (1) All health care providers licensed to practice in this
1174 state may participate in the Florida Health Plan. The Florida
1175 Health Board may determine the eligibility of any other health
Page 47 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1176 care providers to participate in the plan.
1177 (a) A participating health care provider shall comply with
1178 all federal laws and regulations governing referral fees and fee
1179 splitting, including, but not limited to, 42 U.S.C. ss. 1320a-7b
1180 and 1395nn, whether reimbursed by federal funds or not.
1181 (b) A fee schedule or financial incentive may not
1182 adversely affect the care a patient receives or the care a
1183 health provider recommends.
1184 (2) The board shall establish and oversee a fair and
1185 efficient payment system for noninstitutional providers.
1186 (a) The board shall pay noninstitutional providers based
1187 on rates negotiated with noninstitutional providers. The rates
1188 must take into account the need to address the shortage of
1189 noninstitutional providers.
1190 (b) Noninstitutional providers that accept any payment
1191 from the plan for a covered health care service may not bill the
1192 patient for the covered health care service.
1193 (c) Noninstitutional providers shall be paid within 30
1194 business days for claims filed following procedures established
1195 by the board.
1196 (3) The board shall set an annual budget for each
1197 institutional provider, which consists of an operating and a
1198 capital budget, to cover the institutional provider's
1199 anticipated health care services for the following year based on
1200 past performance and projected changes in prices and health care
Page 48 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1201 service levels.
1202 (a) The annual budget for each individual institutional
1203 provider must be set separately. The board may not set a joint
1204 budget for a group of more than one institutional provider nor
1205 for a parent corporation that owns or operates one or more
1206 institutional providers.
1207 (b) Institutional providers that accept any payment from
1208 the plan for a covered health care service may not bill the
1209 patient for the covered health care service.
1210 (4)(a) The board shall periodically develop a capital
1211 investment plan that will serve as a guide in determining the
1212 annual budgets of institutional providers and in deciding
1213 whether to approve applications for approval of capital
1214 expenditures by noninstitutional providers.
1215 (b) Institutional and noninstitutional providers that
1216 propose to make capital purchases in excess of $500,000 must
1217 obtain board approval. The board may alter the threshold
1218 expenditure level that triggers the requirement to submit
1219 information on capital expenditures. Institutional providers
1220 must propose these expenditures and submit the required
1221 information as part of the annual budget they submit to the
1222 board. Noninstitutional providers must apply to the board for
1223 approval of these expenditures. The board must respond to
1224 capital expenditure applications in a timely manner.
1225 (5) The board shall establish payment criteria and payment
Page 49 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1226 methods for care coordination for patients, especially those
1227 with chronic illness and complex medical needs.
1228 Section 13. Section 641.793, Florida Statutes, is created
1229 to read:
1230 641.793 Florida Health Board.—
1231 (1) By December 1, 2026, the Florida Health Board shall be
1232 established to promote the delivery of high-quality, coordinated
1233 health care services that enhance health; prevent illness,
1234 disease, and disability; slow the progression of chronic
1235 diseases; and improve personal health management. The board
1236 shall administer the Florida Health Plan. The board shall
1237 oversee the Office of Health Quality and Planning established in
1238 s. 641.795.
1239 (2)(a) The board shall consist of at least 15 members,
1240 including the representatives selected by the regional planning
1241 boards established in s. 641.794. These representatives shall
1242 appoint the following additional members to serve on the board:
1243 1. One patient member and one employer member.
1244 2. Seven representatives of labor organizations who
1245 represent health care workers or social workers.
1246 3. Five health care providers consisting of one physician,
1247 one registered nurse, one mental health provider, one dentist,
1248 and one health care facility director.
1249 (b) Each member shall take the oath of office to uphold
1250 the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of
Page 50 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1251 the State of Florida and to operate the plan in the public
1252 interest by upholding the underlying principles of this part.
1253 (c) Board members shall serve 4 years; however, for the
1254 purpose of providing staggered terms, of the initial
1255 appointments, those members appointed by the representatives of
1256 regional planning boards shall serve 2-year terms.
1257 (d) The board shall set a board member's compensation, not
1258 to exceed the salary paid under state law to a commissioner on
1259 the Florida Public Service Commission. The board shall select
1260 the chair from among its membership.
1261 (e)1. A board member may be removed by a two-thirds vote
1262 of the members voting on removal. After receiving notice and
1263 hearing, a member may be removed for malfeasance or nonfeasance
1264 in performance of the member's duties.
1265 2. Conviction of any criminal behavior, regardless of how
1266 much time has lapsed, is grounds for immediate removal.
1267 (3) The board shall:
1268 (a) Ensure that all of the requirements of the plan are
1269 met.
1270 (b) Hire a chief executive officer for the plan, who must
1271 take the oath described in paragraph (2)(b).
1272 (c) Hire a director for the Office of Health Quality and
1273 Planning, who must take the oath described in paragraph (2)(b).
1274 (d) Provide technical assistance to the regional planning
1275 boards.
Page 51 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1276 (e) Conduct investigations and inquiries and require the
1277 submission of information, documents, and records that the board
1278 considers necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.
1279 (f) Establish a process for the board to receive concerns,
1280 opinions, ideas, and recommendations of the public regarding all
1281 aspects of the plan and the means of addressing those concerns.
1282 (g) Conduct activities the board considers necessary to
1283 carry out the purposes of this part.
1284 (h) Collaborate with the Department of Health and with the
1285 Agency for Health Care Administration to ensure that each health
1286 care facility performance is monitored and deficient practices
1287 are recognized and corrected in a timely manner.
1288 (i) Establish conflict-of-interest standards that prohibit
1289 health care providers from receiving financial benefit from
1290 their medical decisions outside of board reimbursement,
1291 including any financial benefit for referring a patient for a
1292 service, product, or health care provider or for prescribing,
1293 ordering, or recommending a drug, product, or service.
1294 (j) Establish conflict-of-interest standards related to
1295 pharmaceuticals and medical equipment, supplies, and devices,
1296 and their marketing to a health care provider, so that the
1297 health care provider does not receive any incentive to
1298 prescribe, administer, or use a product or service.
1299 (k) Require all electronic health records used by health
1300 care providers to be fully interoperable with the open source
Page 52 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1301 electronic health records system used by the United States
1302 Department of Veterans Affairs.
1303 (l) Provide financial help and assistance in retraining
1304 and job placement to workers in this state who may be displaced
1305 because of the administrative efficiencies of the plan.
1306 (m) Ensure that assistance is provided to all workers and
1307 communities that may be affected by provisions in this part.
1308 (n) Work with the Department of Commerce to ensure that
1309 funding and program services are promptly and efficiently
1310 provided to all affected workers. The Department of Commerce
1311 shall monitor and report on a regular basis on the status of
1312 displaced workers.
1313 (o) Adopt rules, policies, and procedures as necessary to
1314 carry out the duties assigned under this part.
1315 (4) Before submitting a state innovation waivers
1316 application under s. 1332 of the federal Patient Protection and
1317 Affordable Care Act, Pub. L. No. 111-148, as amended, the board
1318 must do all of the following, as required by federal law:
1319 (a) Conduct, or contract for, any actuarial analyses and
1320 actuarial certifications necessary to support the board's
1321 estimates that the waiver will comply with the comprehensive
1322 coverage, affordability, and scope of coverage requirements in
1323 federal law.
1324 (b) Conduct or contract for any necessary economic
1325 analyses needed to support the board's estimates that the waiver
Page 53 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1326 will comply with the comprehensive coverage, affordability,
1327 scope of coverage, and federal deficit requirements in federal
1328 law. These analyses must include:
1329 1. A detailed 10-year budget plan.
1330 2. A detailed analysis regarding the estimated impact of
1331 the waiver on health insurance coverage in this state.
1332 (c) Establish a detailed draft implementation timeline for
1333 the waiver plan.
1334 (d) Establish quarterly, annual, and cumulative targets
1335 for the comprehensive coverage, affordability, scope of
1336 coverage, and federal deficit requirements in federal law.
1337 (5) The board has the following financial duties:
1338 (a) Approve statewide and regional budgets.
1339 (b) Negotiate and establish payment rates for health care
1340 providers through their professional associations.
1341 (c) Monitor compliance with all budgets and payment rates
1342 and take action to achieve compliance to the extent authorized
1343 by law.
1344 (d) Pay claims for medical products or services as
1345 negotiated and, if deemed necessary, issue requests for
1346 proposals from nonprofit business corporations in this state for
1347 a contract to process claims.
1348 (e) Seek federal approval to bill another state for health
1349 care coverage provided to a patient from out of state who comes
1350 to this state for long-term care or other costly treatment when
Page 54 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1351 the patient's home state fails to provide such coverage, unless
1352 a reciprocal agreement with the patient's home state to provide
1353 similar coverage to residents of this state relocating to that
1354 state can be negotiated.
1355 (f) Implement fraud prevention measures necessary to
1356 protect the operation of the plan.
1357 (g) Work to ensure appropriate cost control by:
1358 1. Instituting aggressive public health measures, early
1359 intervention and preventive care, health and wellness education,
1360 and promotion of personal health improvement.
1361 2. Making changes in the delivery of health care services
1362 and administration that improve efficiency and care quality.
1363 3. Minimizing administrative costs.
1364 4. Ensuring that the delivery system does not contain
1365 excess capacity.
1366 5. Negotiating the lowest possible prices for prescription
1367 drugs, medical equipment, and health care services.
1368 (6) The board has the following management duties:
1369 (a) Develop and implement enrollment procedures for the
1370 plan.
1371 (b) Implement and review eligibility standards for the
1372 plan.
1373 (c) Arrange for health care services to be provided at
1374 convenient locations to serve communities in need in the same
1375 manner as federally qualified health centers, including ensuring
Page 55 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1376 the availability of school nurses so that all students have
1377 access to health care, immunizations, and preventive care at
1378 public schools and encouraging health care providers to provide
1379 services at easily accessible locations.
1380 (d) Make recommendations, when needed, to the Legislature
1381 about changes in the geographic boundaries of the health
1382 planning regions.
1383 (e) Establish an electronic claim and payment system for
1384 the plan.
1385 (f) Monitor the operation of the plan through consumer
1386 surveys and regular data collection and evaluation activities,
1387 including evaluations of the adequacy and quality of services
1388 provided under the plan, the need for changes in the benefit
1389 package, the cost of each type of service, and the effectiveness
1390 of cost control measures under the plan.
1391 (g) Disseminate information and establish a health care
1392 website to provide information to the public about the plan,
1393 including health care providers and facilities, and state and
1394 regional planning board meetings and activities.
1395 (h) Collaborate with public health agencies, schools, and
1396 community clinics.
1397 (i) Ensure that plan policies and health care providers,
1398 including public health care providers, support all residents of
1399 this state in achieving and maintaining maximum physical and
1400 mental health.
Page 56 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1401 (7) The board, in conjunction with the office and
1402 administrative staff of the plan's chief executive officer, has
1403 the following policy duties:
1404 (a) Develop and implement cost control and quality
1405 assurance procedures.
1406 (b) Ensure strong public health services, including
1407 education and community prevention and clinical services.
1408 (c) Ensure a continuum of coordinated high-quality primary
1409 to tertiary care to all residents of this state.
1410 (d) Implement policies to ensure that all residents of
1411 this state receive culturally and linguistically competent care.
1412 (8) The board shall determine the feasibility of self-
1413 insuring health care providers for malpractice and shall
1414 establish a self-insurance system and create a special fund for
1415 payment of losses incurred if the board determines self-insuring
1416 health care providers would reduce costs.
1417 (9) By July 1 of each year, the board shall report to the
1418 President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of
1419 Representatives, and ranking members of the committees having
1420 cognizance over health care issues on:
1421 (a) The performance of the plan.
1422 (b) The fiscal condition and need for payment adjustment.
1423 (c) Any needed changes in geographic boundaries of the
1424 health planning regions.
1425 (d) Any recommendations for statutory changes.
Page 57 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1426 (e) Receipts of revenues from all sources.
1427 (f) Whether current year goals and priorities are met.
1428 (g) Future goals and priorities.
1429 (h) Major new technology and prescription drugs.
1430 (i) Other circumstances that may affect the cost or
1431 quality of health care.
1432 Section 14. Section 641.794, Florida Statutes, is created
1433 to read:
1434 641.794 Health planning regions.—
1435 (1) By August 1, 2026, the Secretary of Health Care
1436 Administration shall designate health planning regions within
1437 this state which are composed of geographically contiguous areas
1438 grouped on the basis of the following considerations:
1439 (a) Patterns of use of health care services.
1440 (b) Health care resources, including workforce resources.
1441 (c) Health care needs of the population, including public
1442 health needs.
1443 (d) Geography.
1444 (e) Population and demographic characteristics.
1445 (f) Other considerations the board deems appropriate.
1446 (2) Each health planning region is administered by a
1447 regional planning board. A minimum of eight regional planning
1448 boards shall be created, and all regional planning boards shall
1449 be created by October 1, 2026.
1450 (a) Each regional planning board shall consist of:
Page 58 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1451 1. One county commissioner per county, selected by the
1452 county commission for each health planning region consisting of
1453 at least five counties; or
1454 2. Three county commissioners per county, selected by the
1455 county commission for each health planning region consisting of
1456 four counties or less.
1457 (b) A county commission may designate a representative to
1458 act as a member of the regional planning board in the member's
1459 absence.
1460 (c) Each regional planning board shall select the chair
1461 from among its membership.
1462 (d) Regional planning board members shall serve for 4-year
1463 terms; however, for the purpose of providing staggered terms, of
1464 the initial appointments, at least half of the board members
1465 shall be appointed to 2-year terms. Board members may receive
1466 per diem for meetings.
1467 (e) The Secretary of Health Care Administration, or his or
1468 her designee, shall convene the first meeting of each regional
1469 planning board with the Florida Health Board within 30 days
1470 after the regional planning board is established.
1471 (3) A regional planning board's duties shall consist of:
1472 (a) Recommending health standards, goals, priorities, and
1473 guidelines for the health planning region.
1474 (b) Preparing an operating and capital budget for the
1475 health planning region to recommend to the Florida Health Board.
Page 59 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1476 (c) Collaborating with local public health care agencies
1477 to:
1478 1. Educate consumers and health care providers on public
1479 health programs, goals, and the means of reaching those goals.
1480 2. Implement public health and wellness initiatives.
1481 (d) Hiring a regional health planning director.
1482 (e) Ensuring that all parts of the health planning region
1483 have access to a 24-hour nurse hotline and to 24-hour urgent
1484 care clinics.
1485 Section 15. Section 641.795, Florida Statutes, is created
1486 to read:
1487 641.795 Office of Health Quality and Planning.—The Florida
1488 Health Board shall establish the Office of Health Quality and
1489 Planning to assess the quality, access, and funding adequacy of
1490 the Florida Health Plan. The Office of Health Quality and
1491 Planning shall:
1492 (1) Make annual recommendations to the board on the
1493 overall direction of the plan on the following subjects:
1494 (a) Overall effectiveness of the plan in addressing public
1495 health and wellness.
1496 (b) Access to health care.
1497 (c) Quality improvement.
1498 (d) Efficiency of administration.
1499 (e) Adequacy of the budget and funding.
1500 (f) Appropriateness of payments to health care providers.
Page 60 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1501 (g) Capital expenditure needs.
1502 (h) Long-term health care.
1503 (i) Mental health and substance abuse services.
1504 (j) Staffing levels and working conditions in health care
1505 facilities.
1506 (k) Identification of the number and mix of health care
1507 facilities and providers necessary to meet the needs of the
1508 plan.
1509 (l) Care for chronically ill patients.
1510 (m) Health care provider training on promoting the use of
1511 advance directives with patients to enable patients to obtain
1512 the health care of their choice.
1513 (n) Research needs.
1514 (o) Integration of disease management programs into health
1515 care delivery.
1516 (2) Analyze shortages in the health care workforce that is
1517 required to meet the needs of the population and develop plans
1518 to meet those needs in collaboration with regional planners and
1519 educational institutions.
1520 (3) Analyze methods of paying health care providers and
1521 make recommendations to improve the quality of health care
1522 services and to control costs.
1523 (4) Assist in coordination of the plan and public health
1524 programs.
1525 (5) Assess and evaluate health care benefits by:
Page 61 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1526 (a) Considering health care benefit additions to the plan
1527 and evaluating the additions based on evidence of clinical
1528 efficacy.
1529 (b) Establishing a process and criteria by which health
1530 care providers may request authorization to provide health care
1531 services and treatments that are not included in the plan
1532 benefit set, such as experimental health care treatments.
1533 (c) Evaluating proposals to increase the efficiency and
1534 effectiveness of the health delivery system, and making
1535 recommendations to the board based on the cost-effectiveness of
1536 the proposals.
1537 (d) Identifying complementary and alternative health care
1538 modalities that have been shown to be safe and effective.
1539 (6) The board may convene advisory panels as needed to
1540 assess the quality, access, and funding adequacy of the plan.
1541 Section 16. Section 641.796, Florida Statutes, is created
1542 to read:
1543 641.796 Ombudsman Office for Patient Advocacy.—
1544 (1) The Ombudsman Office for Patient Advocacy is created
1545 to represent the interests of consumers of health care and to
1546 help residents of this state secure the health care services and
1547 health care benefits to which they are entitled under this part.
1548 The Ombudsman Office for Patient Advocacy shall also advocate on
1549 behalf of enrollees of the Florida Health Plan.
1550 (2) The Ombudsman Office for Patient Advocacy shall be
Page 62 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1551 headed by the ombudsman, who shall be appointed by the Secretary
1552 of Health Care Administration. The ombudsman shall serve in the
1553 unclassified service and may be removed only for just cause. The
1554 ombudsman must be selected without regard to political
1555 affiliation and must be knowledgeable about and have experience
1556 in health care services and administration. A person may not
1557 serve as ombudsman while holding another public office.
1558 (a) The ombudsman may gather information about decisions
1559 and acts of the Florida Health Board and about any matters
1560 related to the board, health care providers, and health care
1561 programs.
1562 (b) The ombudsman shall:
1563 1. Ensure that patient advocacy services are available to
1564 all residents of this state.
1565 2. Establish and maintain the grievance system according
1566 to subsection (3).
1567 3. Receive, evaluate, and respond to consumer complaints
1568 about the plan.
1569 4. Establish a process to receive recommendations from the
1570 public about ways to improve the plan.
1571 5. Develop educational and informational guides that
1572 describe consumer rights and responsibilities.
1573 6. Ensure that the guides described in subparagraph 5. are
1574 widely available to consumers and available in health care
1575 provider offices and facilities.
Page 63 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1576 7. Prepare an annual report about the consumer's
1577 perspective on the performance of the plan, including
1578 recommendations for needed improvements.
1579 (3) The ombudsman shall establish a grievance system for
1580 complaints. The system must provide a process that ensures
1581 adequate consideration of plan enrollee grievances and
1582 appropriate remedies.
1583 (a) The ombudsman may refer any complaint that does not
1584 pertain to compliance with this part to the federal Centers for
1585 Medicare and Medicaid Services or any other appropriate local,
1586 state, and federal government entity for investigation and
1587 resolution.
1588 (b) A health care provider or an employee of a health care
1589 provider may join with, or otherwise assist, a complainant in
1590 submitting a complaint to the ombudsman. A health care provider
1591 or an employee of a health care provider who, in good faith,
1592 joins with or assists a complainant in submitting a complaint is
1593 subject to protections and remedies under this part or under
1594 general law.
1595 (c) In reviewing a complaint, the ombudsman may require a
1596 health care provider or the board to submit any information the
1597 ombudsman deems necessary.
1598 (d)1. The ombudsman shall send a written notice of the
1599 final disposition of the complaint and the reasons for the
1600 decision to:
Page 64 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1601 a. The complainant;
1602 b. Any health care provider or employee of a health care
1603 provider who joins with or assists the complainant in submitting
1604 the complaint; and
1605 c. The board,
1606
1607 within 30 calendar days after receipt of the complaint, unless
1608 the ombudsman determines that additional time is reasonably
1609 necessary to fully and fairly evaluate the relevant grievance.
1610 2. The ombudsman's order of corrective action is binding
1611 on the plan. A decision of the ombudsman is subject to de novo
1612 review by the district court.
1613 (4) The budget for the Ombudsman Office for Patient
1614 Advocacy shall be determined by the Legislature and shall be
1615 independent from the board.
1616 (5) The ombudsman shall establish offices to provide
1617 convenient access to residents of this state.
1618 Section 17. Section 641.797, Florida Statutes, is created
1619 to read:
1620 641.797 Auditor for the Florida Health Plan.—
1621 (1) There is created in the Office of the Auditor General
1622 the position of auditor for the Florida Health Plan to prevent
1623 health care fraud and abuse of the plan. The auditor for the
1624 Florida Health Plan shall be appointed by the Auditor General.
1625 (2) The auditor for the Florida Health Plan shall:
Page 65 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1626 (a) Investigate, audit, and review the financial and
1627 business records of the plan.
1628 (b) Investigate, audit, and review the financial and
1629 business records of individuals, public and private agencies and
1630 institutions, and private corporations that provide services or
1631 products to the plan which are reimbursed by the plan.
1632 (c) Investigate allegations of misconduct on the part of
1633 an employee or appointee of the Florida Health Board and on the
1634 part of any health care provider that is reimbursed by the plan,
1635 and report any findings of misconduct to the Attorney General.
1636 (d) Investigate fraud and abuse.
1637 (e) Arrange for the collection and analysis of data needed
1638 to investigate inappropriate use of a product or service that is
1639 reimbursed by the plan.
1640 (f) Annually report recommendations for improvements to
1641 the plan to the board.
1642 Section 18. Section 641.798, Florida Statutes, is created
1643 to read:
1644 641.798 Ethics and conflicts of interest; Conflict of
1645 Interest Committee.—
1646 (1) The Code of Ethics for Public Officers and Employees
1647 under part III of chapter 112 applies to the employees and the
1648 chief executive officer of the Florida Health Plan, the
1649 employees and members of the Florida Health Board, the employees
1650 and members of the regional planning boards and the regional
Page 66 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1651 health planning directors, the employees and the director of the
1652 Office of Health Quality and Planning, the employees and the
1653 ombudsman of the Ombudsman Office for Patient Advocacy, and the
1654 auditor for the Florida Health Plan. Failure to comply with the
1655 code of ethics under part III of chapter 112 is grounds for
1656 disciplinary action, which may include termination of employment
1657 or removal from the board.
1658 (2) In order to avoid the appearance of political bias or
1659 impropriety, the chief executive officer of the plan may not:
1660 (a) Engage in leadership of, or employment by, a political
1661 party or political organization.
1662 (b) Publicly endorse a political candidate.
1663 (c) Contribute to a political candidate, political party,
1664 or political organization.
1665 (d) Attempt to avoid compliance with this subsection by
1666 making a contribution through a spouse or other family member.
1667 (3) In order to avoid a conflict of interest, a person
1668 specified in subsection (1) may not be employed by a health care
1669 provider or a pharmaceutical, health insurance, or medical
1670 supply company while holding the position specified in
1671 subsection (1), except for the five health care provider members
1672 appointed to the Florida Health Board by the representatives of
1673 regional planning boards under s. 641.793(2)(a)2. These five
1674 members may be employed by a health care provider, but not by a
1675 pharmaceutical, health insurance, or medical supply company
Page 67 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1676 while serving on the board.
1677 (4) The board shall establish a Conflict-of-Interest
1678 Committee to develop standards of practice for persons or
1679 entities doing business with the plan, including, but not
1680 limited to, board members, health care providers, and medical
1681 suppliers.
1682 (a) The committee shall establish guidelines on the duty
1683 to disclose to the committee the existence of any financial
1684 interest and all material facts related to a financial interest.
1685 (b) The committee shall review all proposed transactions
1686 and arrangements that involve the plan. In considering a
1687 proposed transaction or arrangement, if the committee determines
1688 a conflict of interest exists, the committee must investigate
1689 alternatives to the proposed transaction or arrangement. After
1690 exercising due diligence, the committee shall determine whether
1691 the plan can obtain with reasonable efforts a more advantageous
1692 transaction or arrangement with a person or entity which would
1693 not give rise to a conflict of interest. If the committee
1694 determines that a more advantageous transaction or arrangement
1695 is not reasonably possible under the circumstances, the
1696 committee shall make a recommendation to the board on whether
1697 the transaction or arrangement is in the best interest of the
1698 plan, and whether the transaction is fair and reasonable. The
1699 committee shall provide to the board all material information
1700 used to make the recommendation. After reviewing all relevant
Page 68 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1701 information, the board shall decide whether to approve the
1702 transaction or arrangement.
1703 Section 19. Section 641.799, Florida Statutes, is created
1704 to read:
1705 641.799 Florida Health Plan policies and procedures;
1706 rulemaking.—
1707 (1) The Florida Health Plan policies and procedures are
1708 exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act.
1709 (2)(a) If the board determines that a rule should be
1710 adopted under this part to establish, modify, or revoke a policy
1711 or procedure, the board must publish in the state register the
1712 proposed rule and must afford interested persons a period of 30
1713 days after publication to submit written data or comments.
1714 (b) On or before the last day of the 30-day period
1715 provided for the submission of written data or comments under
1716 paragraph (a), any interested person may file with the board
1717 written objections to the proposed rule, stating the grounds for
1718 objection and requesting a public hearing on those objections.
1719 Within 30 days after the last day for submitting written data or
1720 comments, the board shall publish in the state register a notice
1721 specifying the rule to which objections have been filed and a
1722 hearing requested and specifying a time and place for the
1723 hearing.
1724 (c) Within 60 days after the expiration of the period
1725 provided for the submission of written data or comments, or
Page 69 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1726 within 60 days after the completion of any hearing, the board
1727 shall issue a rule adopting, modifying, or revoking a policy or
1728 procedure, or make a determination that a rule should not be
1729 adopted. The rule may contain a provision delaying its effective
1730 date for such period as the board determines is necessary.
1731 Section 20. (1) The Director of the Office of Financial
1732 Regulation of the Department of Financial Services and the chief
1733 executive officer of the Florida Health Plan shall regularly
1734 update the Legislature on the status of the planning,
1735 implementation, and financing of this act.
1736 (2) The Florida Health Plan must be operational by July 1,
1737 2028.
1738 (3) On and after the day the Florida Health Plan becomes
1739 operational, a health insurance policy, a health maintenance
1740 contract, a continuing care contract, a prepaid health clinic
1741 contract, or any policy or contract that offers coverage for
1742 services covered by the Florida Health Plan may not be sold in
1743 this state.
1744 (4) The Office of the Inspector General of the Agency for
1745 Health Care Administration shall prepare an analysis of this
1746 state's capital expenditure needs for the purpose of assisting
1747 the Florida Health Board in adopting the statewide capital
1748 budget for the year following implementation. The Office of the
1749 Inspector General shall submit this analysis to the board.
1750 (5) By July 1, 2027, the Department of Commerce shall
Page 70 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1489 2026
1751 provide to the Florida Health Board, the Governor, and the
1752 chairs and ranking members of the legislative committees with
1753 jurisdiction over health, human services, and commerce a report
1754 determining the appropriations and legislation necessary to
1755 assist all affected individuals and communities through the
1756 transition to the Florida Health Plan.
1757 Section 21. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, but
1758 only if HB 1491 or similar legislation is adopted in the same
1759 legislative session or an extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 71 of 71
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1489-00